Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 10.93 RCW to read as follows:(1) A general authority Washington law enforcement agency or limited authority Washington law enforcement agency, and any officers employed by the agency, may not participate in any training program, exchange, or partnership with any foreign country's military forces, intelligence agencies, or security services.(2) A general authority Washington law enforcement agency or limited authority Washington law enforcement agency may not fund, sponsor, or facilitate its officers' travel to any foreign country for the purpose of training with the foreign country's military forces, intelligence agencies, or security services.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:(1) The Washington state patrol and its officers may not participate in any training program, exchange, or partnership with any foreign country's military forces, intelligence agencies, or security services.(2) The Washington state patrol may not fund, sponsor, or facilitate its officers' travel to any foreign country for the purpose of training with the foreign country's military forces, intelligence agencies, or security services.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:(1) The commission may not participate in, develop, administer, or incorporate into its curricula any training program, exchange, or partnership with any foreign country's military forces, intelligence agencies, or security services.(2) The commission may not fund, sponsor, or facilitate any peace officer's travel to any foreign country for the purpose of training with the foreign country's military forces, intelligence agencies, or security services.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---